Massachusetts, session 194th, S2314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6B of chapter 159B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the second paragraph, the number “35” and
inserting in place thereof the number “48”.
of 1